tables/hu-exceptionwords.cti
#zs, zzs related exceptions
partword \x00ednh\x00e1zsi 34-1345-125-4-345-24
always top\x00e1z 2345-135-1234-4-126	For example topázsárgája word
partword v\x00edz 1236-34-126	For example árvízsújtotta, vízsodor, vízsáv, vízsivatag words
always gazs\x00e1g 1245-1-126-234-4-1245	General exception with gazság part containing words, for example gazság, igazság words
begword g\x0151zs 1245-12456-126-234	For example gőzsugár, gőzsíp words need this exception
begmidword g\x0151zsz 1245-12456-126-156	For example gőzszivattyú word need this exception
always h\x00e1z 125-4-126	This exception prewent wrong present házsor, words
always h\x00e1zs\x00e1rt 125-4-345-4-1235-2345	But házsárt word part need using different exception
always h\x00e1zsad 125-4-345-1-145	An extreeme exception with a Mór Jókai wrote book
always h\x00e1zsas 125-4-345-1-234	An extreeme exception with a Mór Jókai wrote book
always h\x00e1zs\x00e1rkod 125-4-345-4-1235-13-135-145	For example házsárkodását word part need using different exception
partword h\x00e1zsasod 125-4-345-1-234-135-145
begword k\x00e9z 13-16-126	General exception for kéz beginning words, for example kézsérülés, kézzsibbadás words
begword k\x00e9zsm 13-16-345-134	This is an exception the prewious rule, Kézsmárk is a town name
always kal\x00f3z 13-1-123-246-126	for example kalózság, kalózszoftwer, kalózsorsra words
always kalauz 13-1-123-1-136-126
partword k\x00f6zsz 13-12345-126-156	This exception need for közsz part containing words
partword k\x00f6zs 13-12345-126-234
begword k\x00f6zsep\x00e9 13-12345-345-15-1234-16	An extreeme exception with a Mór Jókai wroted book
begword k\x00f6zs\x00f6ln 13-12345-345-12345-123-1345	An extreeme exception with a Mór Jókai wroted book
begword k\x00f6zsr 13-12345-345-1235	An extreeme exception with a Mór Jókai wroted book
begword \x00fctk\x00f6zse 12356-2345-13-12345-345-15	An extreeme exception with a Mór Jókai wroted book
begword matr\x00f3z 134-1-2345-1235-246-126	matróz beginning words need handling single part word, for example matrózsapka word
always m\x00e9zs\x00f6r 134-16-126-234-12345-1235	For example mézsör word need this exception
partword neh\x00e9zs 1345-15-125-16-126-234	For example nehézség, nehézsúly beginning words need this exception
always \x0151zsut 12456-126-234-136-2345	For example őzsuta word need this exception
begword \x0151zseb 12456-126-234-15-12	For example őzsebesen word need this exception
always \x0151zs\x00f6r\x00e9t 12456-126-234-12345-1235-16-2345	For example őzsörét word need this exception
partword p\x00e9nz 1234-16-1345-126	For example pénzsóvár, pénzszűke, pénzzsidóságban words
always p\x00e9nzsed 1234-16-1345-345-15-145
begword p\x00e9nzseg 1234-16-1345-126-234-15-1245	For example pénzsegély word
begword pr\x00e9zsmit 1234-1235-16-345-134-24-2345
begmidword r\x00e9z 1235-16-126
always r\x00e9zs\x00fat 1235-16-345-346-2345	But rézsút beginning words need different exception
partword \x00e1razs\x00e1 4-1235-1-126-234-4	For example szárazság word need this exception
partword \x00e1razs\x00fc 4-1235-1-126-234-12356	For example szárazsült word need this exception
begword sz\x0171zs 156-23456-126-234	For example szűzsült word need this exception
always torzs\x00e1g 2345-135-1235-126-234-4-1245	For example torzság word need handling torz beginning part with single part
begword t\x00f6rzs 2345-12345-1235-345	Törzs beginning word pard need handling single part
always v\x00e1z 1236-4-126	This exception prewent wrong present for example vázsor words
always v\x00e1zsony 1236-4-345-135-1246	But Nagyvázsony is for example an exception
begword m\x00e1lv\x00e1zsi 134-4-123-1236-4-345-24 
partword l\x00e1zseb 123-4-126-234-15-12	For example lázsebességgel word
partword l\x00e1zs\x00f3h 123-4-126-234-246-125	For example lázsóhajtás word
partword it\x00e9zs\x00e9 24-2345-16-126-234-16	This exception prevent wrong presenting for example vitézség word
partword k\x00f6zsere 13-12345-126-234-15-1235-15	For example közsereg word
partword k\x00f6zs\x00e1 13-12345-126-234-4	For example közsáv containing words
partword k\x00f6zszer 13-12345-126-156-15-1235
partword k\x00f6zsor 13-12345-126-234-135-1235	For example eszközsor, eszközsorán word
partword rec\x00edzs\x00e9 1235-15-14-34-126-234-16	For example precízség word
partword nzsoroz 1345-126-234-135-1235-135-126	For example pénzsorozat word need this exception
partword m\x00e9zs\x00e1rg 134-16-126-234-4-1235-1245	For example mézsárga word
always egyezs\x00e9g 15-1456-15-126-234-16-1245	For example egyezség word
always r\x00e9zs\x0171 1235-16-345-23456
partword rozszab 1235-135-345-126-1-12	For example rozszabálás word
begword borzzs\x00ed 12-135-1235-126-345-34	For example borzzsír word
partword bronz 12-1235-135-1345-126	For example bronzsáska, bronzsáskák, bronzsisak, bronzsasokkal words
partword t\x0171z 2345-23456-126	For example tűzsugár, tűzsebesség, tűzzsonglőr words
begword sz\x00e1z 156-4-126
always sz\x00e1zsra 156-4-345-1235-1
partword nemez 1345-15-134-15-126	For example nemezsapka, nemezsapkát, nemezsátor words
begword t\x00edz 2345-34-126
partword lemez 123-15-134-15-126	For example lemezstúdió word
always m\x00e9zser 134-16-126-234-15-1235	For example mézser word
always r\x00e9zsut 1235-16-345-136-2345	For example rézsut word

#Historical person names related exceptions
always t\x00e1ncsics 2345-4-1345-146-24-146	Táncsics Mihály is a historical person for 1848. march 15 hungarian revolution
always batthy\x00e1ny 12-1-2345-2345-125-13456-4-1345-13456	Batthyány Lajos was the first hungarian president for 1848 freedom and revolution 
always th\x00f6k\x00f6ly 2345-125-12345-13-12345-123-13456
always v\x00f6r\x00f6smarty 1236-12345-1235-12345-234-134-1-1235-2345-13456	Mihály Vörösmarty is a very important author for hungarian literary
partword indszenty 24-1345-145-156-15-1345-2345-13456
always anonymu 1-1345-135-1345-13456-134-136

#Town names related exceptions
#Following section containing hungarian town names
begword agyagossz 1-1456-1-1245-135-234-156	For example Agyagosszergény town name
begword b\x00e9k\x00e9ssz 12-16-13-16-234-156	For example Békésszentandrás town name
begword gombossz 1245-135-134-12-135-234-156	For example Gombosszeg town name
begword kapossz 13-1-1234-135-234-156	For example Kaposszekcső, Kaposszerdahely town names
begword kemenessz 13-15-134-15-1345-15-234-156	For example Kemenesszentmárton, Kemenesszentpéter town names
begword kiszsid 13-24-234-345-24-145	For example Kiszsidány town name
begword kisszent 13-24-234-156-15-1345-2345	For example Kisszentmárton tow name
begword kisszig 13-24-234-156-24-1245	For example Kissziget town name
begword mikossz 134-24-13-135-234-156	For example Mikosszéplak town name
begword nemessz 1345-15-134-15-234-156	For example Nemesszalók, Nemesszentandrás town names
begword szamossz 156-1-134-135-234-156	For example Szamosszeg town name
begword szilv\x00e1ssz 156-24-123-1236-4-234-156	For example Szilvásszentmárton town name
begword v\x00e1mossz 1236-4-134-135-234-156	For example Vámosszabadi town name
always vaszar 1236-1-156-1-1235	For example Vaszar town name
begword v\x00e1zsno 1236-4-345-1345-135	For example Vázsnok town name

#After end of number following letters need using different braille markup
endnum a 6-1
endnum b 6-12
endnum c 6-14
endnum d 6-145
endnum e 6-15
endnum f 6-124
endnum g 6-1245
endnum h 6-125
endnum i 6-24
endnum j 6-245
